Florida, session 2026, SB1436.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 49 50 Section 1.âSection 905.27, Florida Statutes, is amended to 51 read: 52 905.27âTestimony and materials not to be disclosed; 53 exceptions.â 54 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 55 (a)ââImmediate family memberâ has the same meaning as in s. 56 252.515(3). 57 (b)ââSexual abuseâ means an act of a sexual nature or 58 sexual act that may be prosecuted under any law of this state. 59 (c)ââSurvivorâ means a victim of an alleged crime of sexual 60 abuse or a capital crime who provided testimony, evidence, or 61 statements in connection with a grand jury proceeding relating 62 to such alleged crime. The term includes a victim of an alleged 63 crime of sexual abuse or a capital crime who was interviewed by 64 an investigator or prosecutor in preparation for a grand jury 65 proceeding even if the victim was not called to testify in the 66 proceeding. 67 (2)(1)âPersons present or appearing during a grand jury 68 proceeding, including a grand juror, a state attorney, an 69 assistant state attorney, a reporter, a stenographer, or an 70 interpreter, as well as the custodian of a grand jury record, 71 may not disclose the testimony of a witness examined before the 72 grand jury, or other evidence received by it, or materials 73 preserved pursuant to s. 905.275(2) except when required by a 74 court to disclose the testimony or materials for the purpose of: 75 (a)âAscertaining whether testimony it is consistent with 76 the testimony given by the witness before the court; 77 (b)âDetermining whether the witness is guilty of perjury; 78 or 79 (c)âFurthering justice, which can encompass furthering a 80 public interest when the disclosure is requested pursuant to 81 paragraph (3)(c) or (d) (2)(c). 82 (3)(2)âIt is unlawful for any person knowingly to publish, 83 broadcast, disclose, divulge, or communicate to any other 84 person, or knowingly to cause or permit to be published, 85 broadcast, disclosed, divulged, or communicated to any other 86 person, in any manner whatsoever, any testimony of a witness 87 examined before the grand jury or any materials preserved 88 pursuant to s. 905.275(2), or the content, gist, or import 89 thereof, except when such testimony or materials are or have is 90 or has been disclosed in any of the following circumstances: 91 (a)âWhen a court orders the disclosure of such testimony 92 pursuant to subsection (2) (1) for use in a criminal case, it 93 may be disclosed to the prosecuting attorney of the court in 94 which such criminal case is pending, and by the prosecuting 95 attorney to his or her assistants, legal associates, and 96 employees, and to the defendant and the defendantâs attorney, 97 and by the latter to his or her legal associates and employees. 98 However, the grand jury testimony afforded such persons by the 99 court can only be used in the defense or prosecution of the 100 criminal case and for no other purpose. 101 (b)âWhen a court orders the disclosure of such testimony 102 pursuant to subsection (2) (1) for use in a civil case, it may 103 be disclosed to all parties to the case and to their attorneys 104 and by the latter to their legal associates and employees. 105 However, the grand jury testimony afforded such persons by the 106 court can only be used in the defense or prosecution of the 107 civil case and for no other purpose. 108 (c)âWhen a court orders the disclosure of such testimony or 109 materials pursuant to subsection (2) (1) in response to a 110 request by the media or an interested person, regardless of 111 whether that purpose is for use in a criminal or civil case, it 112 may be disclosed so long as the subject of the grand jury 113 inquiry is deceased, the grand jury inquiry related to criminal 114 or sexual activity between the subject of the grand jury 115 investigation and a person who was a minor at the time of the 116 alleged criminal or sexual activity, the testimony or materials 117 were was previously disclosed by a court order, and the state 118 attorney is provided notice of the request. This paragraph does 119 not limit the courtâs ability to limit the disclosure of 120 testimony or materials, including, but not limited to, 121 redaction. 122 (d)âWhen a court orders the disclosure of such testimony or 123 materials pursuant to subsection (2) in response to a request by 124 a survivor or an immediate family member of a survivor, 125 regardless of whether that purpose is for use in a criminal or 126 civil case, the testimony or materials may be disclosed so long 127 as the subject of the grand jury inquiry is deceased and the 128 state attorney is provided notice of the request. This paragraph 129 does not limit the courtâs ability to limit the disclosure of 130 testimony or materials, including, but not limited to, 131 redaction. 132 (4)(3)âThis section does not affect the attorney-client 133 relationship. A client has the right to communicate to his or 134 her attorney any testimony given by the client to the grand 135 jury, any matters involving the client discussed in the clientâs 136 presence before the grand jury, and any evidence involving the 137 client received by or proffered to the grand jury in the 138 clientâs presence. 139 (5)(4)âA person who violates this section commits a 140 misdemeanor of the first degree, punishable as provided in s. 141 775.083, or by fine not exceeding $5,000, or both. 142 (6)(5)âA violation of this section constitutes criminal 143 contempt of court. 144 Section 2.âSection 905.275, Florida Statutes, is created to 145 read: 146 905.275âPreservation of grand jury materials.â 147 (1)âThe clerk of court shall take possession of and 148 preserve all materials presented or created during a grand jury 149 proceeding. A person may not dispose of or destroy such 150 materials. 151 (2)âFor purposes of this section, the term âmaterialsâ 152 includes all of the following: 153 (a)âDigital recordings. 154 (b)âAudio and video materials. 155 (c)âPaper records produced by members of the grand jury, 156 witnesses, and the court. 157 (d)âAny computer; hard drive; electronic storage device or 158 digital recording medium, including, but not limited to, 159 outdated media such as compact discs, DVDs, and floppy discs; 160 and electronic devices from which evidence is recovered during 161 an investigation that leads to a grand jury proceeding. 162 (e)âSubpoenas. 163 (f)âAny other materials, documents, storage devices, media, 164 and data associated with a grand jury proceeding. 165 166 The term âmaterialsâ does not include internal state attorney 167 work product, legal memoranda, or investigative intelligence not 168 presented to the grand jury or entered into the record. 169 (3)âThe clerk of court shall: 170 (a)âMaintain a chain of custody list for grand jury 171 materials during each grand jury proceeding and restrict access 172 to such list. Such list must include the name of any person who 173 accesses the materials, the materials the person accessed, and 174 the time and date that the person accessed the materials. A 175 redacted version of the chain of custody document is a public 176 record. 177 (b)âStore all grand jury related materials that are in his 178 or her possession in secured, sealed containers and keep such 179 containers in a secure location in the courthouse that is free 180 from mold, water, dust, and other storage hazards. 181 (c)âProhibit unauthorized persons, such as maintenance 182 personnel, visitors, and staff who are not employees of the 183 clerk of court, from accessing or viewing the stored materials. 184 (d)âRetain the chain of custody list outside the place in 185 which grand jury materials are stored which documents all of the 186 following: 187 1.âThe name of any person who accesses the materials. 188 2.âThe materials the person accessed. 189 3.âThe time and date the person accessed the materials. 190 (4)âIf the state attorney or any of his or her employees 191 possesses any of the materials described in subsection (2) which 192 were not presented to the grand jury or were not otherwise made 193 part of the court record, he or she shall preserve such 194 materials. 195 (5)âAll materials preserved pursuant to this section must 196 be retained for 50 years after any criminal proceedings 197 associated with such materials have concluded unless a court 198 orders otherwise. 199 (6)âThe Office of the State Courts Administrator shall 200 adopt uniform statewide rules for retention, management, and 201 storage of grand jury materials to ensure consistency and reduce 202 burdens on clerks of court. The Office of the State Courts 203 Administrator may perform inspections to confirm that clerks of 204 court are in compliance with this section. 205 (7)âA person or entity who possesses or stores any grand 206 jury materials as described in this section shall disclose and 207 provide access to such materials upon a court order pursuant to 208 s. 905.27. 209 (8)âAny person who intentionally destroys or alters any of 210 the materials described in subsection (2) commits a felony of 211 the third degree, as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 212 775.084. The Department of Law Enforcement shall investigate 213 alleged violations of the preservation requirements in this 214 section. 215 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.